Washington statutes.
RCW 31.40.080

Records—Reports—Loan loss reserve.

(1) A licensee shall keep books, accounts, and other records in such a form and manner as the director may require. These records shall be kept at such a place and shall be preserved for such a length of time as the director may specify.

(2) Not more than ninety days after the close of each calendar year or within a period specified by the director, a licensee shall file with the director a report containing the following:

(a) Financial statements, including the balance sheet, the statement of income or loss, the statement of changes in capital accounts and the statement of changes in financial position; and

(b) Other information that the director may require.

(3) Each licensee shall provide for a loan loss reserve sufficient to cover projected loan losses which are not guaranteed by the United States government or any agency thereof.

[ 1994 c 92 s 267; 1989 c 212 s 8.]